Tennessee, session 114, SB1623.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-4-104, is amended by adding the
following at the end of subdivision (e)(1):
Beginning January 1, 2027, the validation or revalidation tab, sticker, or other device
issued for a calendar year must be a different color scheme than the color scheme of the
validation or revalidation tab, sticker, or device issued for the previous calendar year.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1623
010773
- 1 -